Utah statutes.
19-9-117.   Publication of resolution authorizing obligations -- Contesting validity -- Action to compel signing of obligations.

(1)  Each resolution adopted by the authority authorizing the issuance of obligations shall be published in a newspaper with general circulation in the state.  For a period of 30 days after the date of publication, any interested person may contest the legality of the resolution, the obligations authorized by it, or any provision made for the security and payment of the proposed obligations.  At the expiration of the 30-day period, no person, except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), has standing to contest the validity of such action.

(2)  If any official required to sign obligations refuses to sign them, alleging that the obligations are illegal, the authority may bring an original action in the state Supreme Court for a writ of mandamus to compel the official to sign the obligations.

